Tennessee, session 114, HB0215.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. In addition to any other funds appropriated by the provisions of this act,
there is appropriated the sum of $25,000,000 (non-recurring) to the legislature for the planning
and construction of a new parking garage with at least 400 parking spaces, to be attached to the
north side of the Cordell Hull Building and used solely by legislative employees.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0215
000085
- 1 -